Hawaii statutes.
§183C-8 Zoning order; appeal to circuit
environmental court. [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2019. L 2016,
c 48, §14] Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any final
order of the department based upon this chapter may be appealed to the circuit
environmental court of the circuit in which the land in question is found. The
appeal shall be in accord with chapter 91 and the Hawaii rules of civil
procedure. [L 1994, c 270, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 218, §8; am L 2016, c 48, §7]

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §12.

Rules of Court

Appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule 72.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next